de: Konfiguration der Kiteleinen: 1-Leiner; 2-Leiner; 3-Leiner; 4-Leiner; 5-Leiner; Sonstige
zh-TW: 風箏線配置: 單線; 雙線; 3 線; 4 線; 5 線; 其他
en: Kite line configuration: 1-line; 2-line; 3-line; 4-line; 5-line; Other
el: Διαμόρφωση σχοινιών αετού: 1 γραμμής; 2 γραμμών; 3 γραμμών; 4 γραμμών; 5 γραμμών; Άλλο
pt-PT: Configuração das linhas do kite: 1 linha; 2 linhas; 3 linhas; 4 linhas; 5 linhas; Outro
lt-LT: Aitvaro lynų konfigūracija: 1 lyno; 2 lynų; 3 lynų; 4 lynų; 5 lynų; Kita
nb: Dragelinekonfigurasjon: 1-linet; 2-linet; 3-linet; 4-linet; 5-linet; Annet
sl-SI: Konfiguracija vrvic za zmaja: 1 vrvica; 2 vrvici; 3 vrvice; 4 vrvice; 5 vrvic; Drugo
es: Configuración de líneas del kite: 1 línea; 2 líneas; 3 líneas; 4 líneas; 5 líneas; Otra
zh-CN: 风筝线配置: 1 线; 2 线; 3 线; 4 线; 5 线; 其他
ko: 연줄 구성: 1라인; 2라인; 3라인; 4라인; 5라인; 기타
bg-BG: Конфигурация на въжето на хвърчилото: С 1 линия; 2 линии; 3 линии; 4 линии; 5 линии; Друго
ja: カイトラインの構成: 1ライン; 2ライン; 3ライン; 4ライン; 5ライン; その他
hu: Sárkányzsinór konfigurációja: 1 zsinóros; 2 zsinóros; 3 zsinóros; 4 zsinóros; 5 zsinóros; Egyéb
cs: Konfigurace šňůry draka: 1šňůrový; 2šňůrový; 3šňůrový; 4šňůrový; 5šňůrový; Jiné
sv: Drake – linans utförande: 1 lina; 2 linor; 3 linor; 4 linor; 5 linor; Övrigt
th: การกำหนดค่าสายว่าว: 1 สาย; 2 สาย; 3 สาย; 4 สาย; 5 สาย; อื่นๆ
pt-BR: Configuração das linhas do kite: 1 linha; 2 linhas; 3 linhas; 4 linhas; 5 linhas; Outra
da: Kite line-konfiguration: 1 linje; 2 linjer; 3 linjer; 4 linjer; 5 linjer; Andet
hr-HR: Konfiguracija uzice zmaja: 1 linija; 2 linije; 3 linije; 4 linije; 5 linija; Ostalo
nl: Kite lijn configuratie: 1-lijns; 2-lijns; 3-lijns; 4-lijns; 5-lijns; Anders
fr: Configuration des lignes du cerf-volant: 1 ligne; 2 lignes; 3 lignes; 4 lignes; 5 lignes; Autre
ro-RO: Configurația liniei de zmeu: 1 sfoară; 2 sfori; 3 sfori; 4 sfori; 5 sfori; Altele
vi: Cấu hình dây diều: 1 dây; 2 dây; 3 dây; 4 dây; 5 dây; Khác
tr: Uçurtma ipi yapılandırması: 1 ipli; 2 ipli; 3 ipli; 4 ipli; 5 ipli; Diğer
fi: Leijan siimojen kokoonpano: 1-naruinen; 2-naruinen; 3-naruinen; 4-naruinen; 5-naruinen; Muu
ru: Конфигурация строп кайта: 1 стропа; 2 стропы; 3 стропы; 4 стропы; 5 строп; Другое
pl: Konfiguracja linek latawca: 1-linkowy; 2-linkowy; 3-linkowy; 4-linkowy; 5-linkowy; Inna
sk-SK: Konfigurácia šnúr šarkana: 1-šnúrový; 2-šnúrový; 3-šnúrový; 4-šnúrový; 5-šnúrový; Iné
it: Configurazione del filo dell'aquilone: A 1 linea; A 2 linee; A 3 linee; A 4 linee; A 5 linee; Altro